Tennessee, session 114, SB2609.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-103, is amended by adding the
following as a new, appropriately designated subsection:
( )
(1) As used in this subsection ( ):
(A) "Recreational vessel":
(i) Means a vessel manufactured or used primarily for
noncommercial use; and
(ii) Includes vessels propelled by sail or machinery and
nonmotorized vessels as defined in § 69-9-227;
(B) "Recreational vessel accessories":
(i) Means equipment, parts, and accessories used in
association with, or to transport, recreational vessels; and
(ii) Includes trailers, trolling motors, life jackets, covers,
waterproof dry bags, roof racks, transport carts, seat backs,
paddles, and oars;
(C) "Vessel" has the same meaning as defined in § 69-9-204; and
(D) "Wildlife-related outdoor recreational goods":
SB2609
012298
- 1 -

(i) Means tangible personal property manufactured or
used primarily for hunting, angling, trapping, shooting, or fishing;
and
(ii) Includes ammunition; firearms; firearm accessories;
decoys; stands; traps; game calls; archery bows; fishing rods,
lures, and reels; and tackle boxes.
(2) Notwithstanding the allocations provided for in subsection (a), all
state sales and use tax derived from the sale, use, consumption, or distribution of
recreational vessels, recreational vessel accessories, and wildlife-related outdoor
recreational goods on or after July 1, 2026, must be earmarked and allocated to
the wildlife resources fund, to be used for payment of the wildlife resource
agency's operational expenses.
(3) Notwithstanding this subsection ( ) to the contrary, no portion of the
revenue derived from the increase in the rate of sales and use tax allocated to
educational purposes, pursuant to chapter 529, § 9 of the Public Acts of 1992,
and no portion of the revenue derived from the increase in the rate of sales and
use tax from six percent (6%) to seven percent (7%), pursuant to chapter 856, §
4 of the Public Acts of 2002, must be apportioned and distributed pursuant to this
subsection ( ). All such revenue must continue to be allocated as provided in
chapter 529, § 9 of the Public Acts of 1992, and chapter 856, § 4 of the Public
Acts of 2002, respectively.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012298